src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Gen-sg-initial
SéUrú;          !! eg. tábhacht a n-oidhreachta
#;          !! eg. bia cait, bia sagairt, bia stóir, 
            !!     bia rúin, pobail  
            !!     siopa grósaera - a grocer's shop
+DefArt:^Sé^hv^ts   #;  !! eg. bia an chait,an íl, bia an stóir 
            !!     bia an éin (the bird's food)
            !! eg. bia an tsagairt (overgenerates 
            !!     tshagairt, h will be removed,
            !! eg. bia an rúin, an phobail
            !! eg. siopa an ghrósaera - the grocer's shop
!-------------------
!! VOCATIVE SINGULAR 
!-------------------
!! Since this is trivial (always ^Sé) it is included with Final Mutations
!! in Voc-sg-0 and Voc-sg-1.
                    
!------------
! ALL PLURALS
!------------
! Note: Vocative Plural does not require Def & Idf but it is easier to generate 
! them and remove all Voc Pl Idfs at the end (the Def form is correct 
! although the Def marker is unnecessary)

LEXICON Pl-initial
+DefArt:^Sé^Urú^hv          #;  ! eg. na cait (m)
SéUrú;                  ! optional initial mutations for posession, after prepositions

!************************************************************************** 
!! FINAL MUTATIONS
!************************************************************************** 
!-------------------
!! NOMINATIVE SINGULAR
!-------------------
LEXICON Nom-sg
+Sg:0   Nom-sg-initial;

!-------------------
!! GENITIVE SINGULAR 
!-------------------

LEXICON Gen-sg-D1       ! 1st. Declension - Caolú (Slenderise)
+Sg:^Caol   Gen-sg-initial;

LEXICON Gen-sg-D2       ! 2nd. Declension - Caolú (Slenderise) and
                ! Add "e"
+Sg:^Caole  Gen-sg-initial;

LEXICON Gen-sg-D2a      ! 2nd. Declension - each -> í, ach -> aí 
                ! tintreach - tintrí 
+Sg:^Ath    Gen-sg-initial;

LEXICON Gen-sg-D3       ! 3rd. Declension -  Broaden (Leathnú) and
                ! Add "a"
+Sg:^Leaa   Gen-sg-initial;


LEXICON Gen-sg-D4       ! 4th. Declension - No change
+Sg:0   Gen-sg-initial;

LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-1     ! 5th. Declension - (Broaden) + ach
+Sg:^Leaach Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-2     ! 5th. Declension - Sync + (e)ach
+Sg:^Coim^VHach Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-2a        ! 5th. Declension - Sync + a
+Sg:^Coim^VHa   Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-2b        ! 5th. Declension - Sync + Slen + e
+Sg:^Coim^Caole Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-3     ! 5th. Declension - Add "n"
+Sg:n       Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-4     ! 5th. Declension - Add "d"
+Sg:d       Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-5     ! 5th. Declension -  Broaden (Leathnú)
+Sg:^Lea    Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-6     ! 5th. Declension -  Change + ithe
+Sg:^Athithe    Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-7     ! 5th. Declension -  Change + Slen + the
+Sg:^Ath^Caolthe    Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-8     ! 5th. Declension -  Change + Slen + te
+Sg:^Ath^Caolte Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-9     ! 5th. Declension -  Change + tha
+Sg:^Aththa Gen-sg-initial;
LEXICON Gen-sg-D5-10        ! 5th. Declension -  Change + ta
+Sg:^Athta  Gen-sg-initial;

!-------------------
!! VOCATIVE SINGULAR 
!-------------------

LEXICON Voc-sg-0
+Sg+Len:^Sé     #;  ! eg. a rún, a phobal

LEXICON Voc-sg-1
+Sg+Len:^Caol^Sé    #;  ! eg. a éin - O bird!
                !     a chait, a íl 
                ! eg. a shagairt 

LEXICON Voc-initial
+Len:^IM^Sé     #;  ! Jul 2012 added +Len

!-------------------------------------------------------------------------
!-------------------
!! ALL PLURALS
!-------------------


LEXICON PL-TADA                 ! NO CHANGE (LIT. NOTHING)
+Pl:0       Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-CAOLÚ                ! CAOLÚ (SLENDERISE)
+Pl:^Caol   Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-LEATHNÚ              ! LEATHNÚ (BROADEN)
+Pl:^Lea    Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-(LEA)A               ! ADD "A" & LEATHNÚ (BROADEN) IF SLENDER
+Pl:^Leaa   Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-TA                   ! ADD "TA"
+Pl:ta      Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-(LEA)THA             ! ADD "THA" & LEATHNÚ IF SLENDER
+Pl:^Leatha Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-(E)ANNA              ! ADD "ANNA" IF BROAD & ADD "EANNA" IF SLENDER
+Pl:^VHanna Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-Í                    ! ADD "Í"
+Pl:í       Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-(CAOL)E              ! ADD "E" & CAOLÚ IF BROAD
+Pl:^Caole  Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-(CAOL)EACHA          ! ADD "EACHA" & CAOLÚ
+Pl:^Caoleacha  Pl-initial;

LEXICON PL-(LEA)ACHA            ! ADD "ACHA" & LEATHNÚ
+Pl:^Leaacha    Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-(E)ACHA              ! ADD "ACHA" IF BROAD & ADD "EACHA" IF SLENDER
+Pl:^VHacha Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-TE                   ! ADD "TE"
+Pl:te      Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-AÍ                   ! ADD "AÍ"
+Pl:aí      Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-NNA                  ! ADD "NNA"
+Pl:nna     Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-THE                  ! ADD "THE"
+Pl:the     Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-NA                   ! ADD "NA"
+Pl:na      Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-IDÍ                  ! ADD "IDÍ"
+Pl:idí     Pl-initial;


LEXICON PL-ATHRÚ                ! ATHRÚ (CHANGE LAST SYLLABLE)
+Pl:^Ath    Pl-initial;

LEXICON PL-(E)ANTA              ! ADD "ANTA" IF BROAD & ADD "EANTA" IF SLENDER
+Pl:^VHanta Pl-initial;

LEXICON PL-ITE                  ! ADD "ITE"
+Pl:ite     Pl-initial;

LEXICON PL-ONNA                 ! ADD "ONNA"
+Pl:onna        Pl-initial;

LEXICON PL-OCHA                 ! ADD "OCHA"
+Pl:ocha        Pl-initial;

!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!==========================================================================
! CONTINUATION CLASSES FEMININE
!==========================================================================
LEXICON NI-fairgsin
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:fairgsin^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:fairgseana^F^G     Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:fairgsine      Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-teasach
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:teasach^F^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:teascha^F^G        Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:teasacha       Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-uaim
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:uaim^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:uama^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:uaim       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:uamanna^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:uamanna^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:uamanna    Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-sliasaid
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:sliasaid^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:sliasaide^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:sliasaid       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:sliasta^C      Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:sliasta^G   Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:sliasta    Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-nóin
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:nóin^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:nóna^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:nóin       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:nónta^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:nónta^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:nónta  Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-culaith
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:culaith^F^C        Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:culaithe^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:culaith        Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:cultacha^C     Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:cultacha^G  Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:cultacha   Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-fala
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:fala^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:fala^F^G       Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:fala       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:falta^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:falta^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:falta  Voc-initial;

LEXICON NI-leis
+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:leis^F^C       Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:leise^F^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:leis       Voc-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:leasracha^C        Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong+Pl:leasracha^G Pl-initial;
+Noun+Fem+Voc+Pl+Def:leasracha  Voc-initial;
