src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounsIrregular
leis:		NI-leis;
fala:		NI-fala;
culaith:	NI-culaith;
nóin:		NI-nóin;
sliasaid:	NI-sliasaid;
fairgsin:		NI-fairgsin;
teasach:		NI-teasach;
uaim:		NI-uaim;
taobhuaim:taobh		NI-uaim;
tuaim:t		NI-uaim;
